Utah statutes.
4-32-22.   Animals slaughtered or the meat and poultry products not intended for human use -- No inspection -- Products to be denatured or otherwise identified.

Inspection may not be provided under this chapter at any establishment for the slaughter of animals or the preparation of any meat or poultry products that are not intended for use as human food, but the products shall be denatured or otherwise identified as prescribed by rules of the department before their offer for sale or transportation.

